District of Columbia statutes.
50-1621

Civil action for bicyclists.

(a)

An individual who, while riding a bicycle, is the victim of an assault or battery by a motorist, and prevails in a civil action for such assault or battery, shall be entitled to:

(1)

Statutory damages of $1,000 or actual damages, whichever is greater;

(2)

Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs; provided, that the total amount of damages is less than $10,000; and

(3)

Any other relief available under the law.

(b)

For the purposes of this section, the term “motorist” means an individual who operates a motor vehicle, as defined in § 50-2301.02(5A).

Apr. 20, 2013, D.C. Law 19-264, § 2, 60 DCR 1346